Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 2. Hospital Revenue Bonds

§ 18-8-201.
Definitions; county memorial hospital; authority to issue revenue securities; purpose.

When a county memorial hospital as defined in W.S.

18-8-101

has been established as provided in W.S.

18-8-102

the board of county commissioners when requested by the board of trustees of a county memorial hospital may issue revenue bonds, notes and warrants or other revenue securities for the purpose of acquiring, erecting, constructing, reconstructing, improving, remodeling, furnishing or equipping hospitals or related facilities, or acquiring a site or sites therefor. The procedure for issuing or refunding revenue bonds is the same as prescribed by W.S.

35-2-424

through

35-2-436

as from time to time amended.

The trustees of a county memorial hospital may obtain financing for its operations by entering into agreements for lines of credit with any financial institution as defined in W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix). The line of credit may either be unsecured, or secured by a pledge of revenues anticipated to be received during the current fiscal year.

In addition to the authority of the county commissioners to issue certificates of indebtedness to meet the obligations of county memorial hospitals under W.S.

18-4-104

, with the permission of the board of county commissioners, the trustees of a county memorial hospital may issue tax and revenue anticipation notes in amounts not to exceed eighty percent (80%) of the total amount of taxes levied for operation of the hospital for the fiscal year during which the notes are issued when the board determines that insufficient funds are available to meet the obligations of the hospital during any fiscal year. A county memorial hospital shall not enter into agreements or issue instruments of the type allowed by this section for any fiscal year until all debts financed by such agreements or instruments for any prior fiscal year have been paid in full. Tax and revenue anticipation notes issued under this subsection are subject to the procedural requirements of W.S.

9-4-1103

through

9-4-1105

for state tax and revenue anticipation notes, except:

The authority of the state treasurer referenced in W.S.

9-4-1103

through

9-4-1105

shall be exercised by the board issuing the notes; and

Investments of the proceeds of the notes by the trustees are limited to those investments authorized under W.S.

9-4-831

and 18-8-104(d).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 142, § 1; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 2000, ch. 46, § 1; 2005, ch. 172, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

in (c)(ii), deleted “Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-1105(a)” at the beginning and added “and 18-8-104(d)” at the end.

Laws 2005, ch. 172, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2005.